Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202381-12,221
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Shovel-Ready Capital Recovery and Investment Act:

(1) Capital project means a construction project to build, expand, or develop a new or existing facility or facilities or restoration work on a facility designated as a National Historic Landmark;

(2) Cost, in the context of a capital project, means the cost of land, engineering, architectural planning, contract services, construction, materials, and equipment needed to complete the capital project;

(3) COVID-19 means the novel coronavirus identified as SARS-CoV-2, the disease caused by the novel coronavirus SARS-CoV-2 or a virus mutating therefrom, and the health conditions or threats associated with the disease caused by the novel coronavirus SARS-CoV-2 or a virus mutating therefrom;

(4) Department means the Department of Economic Development;

(5) Qualified nonprofit organization means a tax-exempt organization under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code that:

(a) Is related to arts, culture, or the humanities, including any organization formed for the purpose of developing and promoting the work of artists and the humanities in various visual and performing forms, such as film, sculpture, dance, painting, horticulture, multimedia, poetry, photography, performing arts, zoology, or botany;

(b) Operates a sports complex;

(c) Is a postsecondary educational institution in a city of the metropolitan class and partners with an organization hosting a regional or national event for purposes of infrastructure development related to furnishing and equipment for a health sciences education center, enhanced mobility by vacation of a public street, pedestrian safety, and construction of a community athletic complex; or

(d) Is a county agricultural society with facilities located within the boundaries of a city of the primary class;

(6) Sports complex means property that:

(a) Includes indoor areas, outdoor areas, or both;

(b) Is primarily used for competitive sports; and

(c) Contains multiple separate sports venues; and

(7) Sports venue includes, but is not limited to:

(a) A baseball field;

(b) A softball field;

(c) A soccer field;

(d) An outdoor stadium primarily used for competitive sports;

(e) An outdoor arena primarily used for competitive sports; and

(f) An enclosed, temperature-controlled building primarily used for competitive sports.

Laws 2021, LB566, § 3;

Laws 2023, LB531, § 42;

Laws 2023, LB818, § 27.
The Revisor of Statutes has pursuant to section 49-769 correlated LB531, section 42, with LB818, section 27, to reflect all amendments.Changes made by LB531 became operative June 7, 2023. Changes made by LB818 became effective May 25, 2023.